Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-513
County judge; salary; class; expenses.

On January 6, 1983, and thereafter each county judge shall receive an annual salary in an amount equal to eighty-five percent of the salary set for the Chief Justice and judges of the Supreme Court. As soon as the same may be legally paid under the Constitution of Nebraska after January 1, 2000, each county judge shall receive an annual salary in an amount equal to eighty-eight percent of the salary set for the Chief Justice and judges of the Supreme Court. As soon as the same may be legally paid under the Constitution of Nebraska after January 1, 2001, each county judge shall receive an annual salary in an amount equal to eighty-nine percent of the salary set for the Chief Justice and judges of the Supreme Court. As soon as the same may be legally paid under the Constitution of Nebraska after January 1, 2002, each county judge shall receive an annual salary in an amount equal to ninety percent of the salary set for the Chief Justice and judges of the Supreme Court.

Judges of the county court shall be considered to be of the same class and when one member of the class, as a judge of the county court, is entitled to a raise in salary, all members of the class shall be entitled to such raise in salary. All county judges shall be compensated for necessary travel expenses in the same manner as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. Salaries of clerk magistrates and other employees of the court shall be set by rule by the Supreme Court.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 13;

Laws 1973, LB 40, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 141, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 76, § 3;

Laws 1978, LB 672, § 3;

Laws 1979, LB 398, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 111, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 35;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 839, § 1.